src/fst/morphology/affixes/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON CI 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:%>a # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:%>a # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def:%>a # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:%>u # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:%>u # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def:%>u # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def:%>u # ;
! Fem
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%>u # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%>u # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>u # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>u # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:%>u # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:%>u # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:%>u # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:%>u # ;
! Neu
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>i # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:%>a # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:%>a # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:%>a # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:%>a # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:%>u # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:%>u # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def:%>u # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def:%>u # ;

LEXICON Comp_Ri
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 CRi ;
 SRi ;
 
LEXICON CRi 
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:%>ra # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ra # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ra # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:%>ru # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:%>ru # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def:%>ru # ;
 +Comp+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def:%>ru # ;
! Fem
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%>ru # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%>ru # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ru # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ru # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:%>ru # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:%>ru # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:%>ru # ;
 +Comp+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:%>ru # ;
! Neu
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>ri # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:%>ra # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:%>ra # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:%>ra # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:%>ra # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:%>ru # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:%>ru # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def:%>ru # ;
 +Comp+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def:%>ru # ;

LEXICON SRi
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Superl+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>stur # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>stan # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>stum # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>sts # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>stir # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>star # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>stum # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>sta # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>stra # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def:%>sti # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def:%>sta # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def:%>sta # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def:%>sta # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def:%>stu # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def:%>stu # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def:%>stu # ;
 +Superl+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def:%>stu # ;
! Fem
 +Superl+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>st # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>sta # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>stari # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>star # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>strar # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>star # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>star # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>stum # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>sta # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>stra # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:%>sta # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:%>stu # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>stu # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:%>stu # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:%>stu # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:%>stu # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:%>stu # ;
 +Superl+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def:%>stu # ;
! Neu
 +Superl+Neu+Sg+Nom+Indef:%>st # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Sg+Acc+Indef:%>st # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Sg+Dat+Indef:%>stum # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Sg+Gen+Indef:%>sts # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Pl+Nom+Indef:%>st # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Pl+Acc+Indef:%>st # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Pl+Dat+Indef:%>stum # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>sta # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Pl+Gen+Indef:%>stra # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Sg+Nom+Def:%>sta # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Sg+Acc+Def:%>sta # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Sg+Dat+Def:%>sta # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Sg+Gen+Def:%>sta # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Pl+Nom+Def:%>stu # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Pl+Acc+Def:%>stu # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Pl+Dat+Def:%>stu # ;
 +Superl+Neu+Pl+Gen+Def:%>stu # ;

!LEXICON adjcmp1
!     +Comp:ar  indef_cmp_adj_decl    ;
!  +Superl:ast indef_superl_adj_decl ;

! Gender

LEXICON indef_cmp_adj_decl
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
     +Msc+Sg:    indef_case ;
     +Fem+Sg:    indef_case ;
     +Neu+Sg:    indef_case ;

 +Msc+Sg+Nom:%>i deftag     ;
 +Msc+Sg+Acc:%>a deftag     ;
 +Msc+Sg+Dat:%>a deftag     ;
     +Msc+Pl:%>u deftag     ;
 +Fem+Sg+Nom:%>a deftag     ;
 +Fem+Sg+Acc:%>u deftag     ;
 +Fem+Sg+Dat:%>u deftag     ;
     +Fem+Pl:%>u deftag     ;
 +Neu+Sg+Nom:%>a deftag     ;
 +Neu+Sg+Acc:%>a deftag     ;
 +Neu+Sg+Dat:%>a deftag     ;
     +Neu+Pl:%>u deftag     ;

        +Adv:%>i #          ;

LEXICON indef_case
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
  +Nom: indeftag ;
  +Acc: indeftag ;
  +Gen: indeftag ;
  +Dat: indeftag ;

!LEXICON def_case
! +Nom: deftag   ;
! +Acc: deftag   ;
! +Gen: deftag   ;
! +Dat: deftag   ;


! Definiteness

LEXICON indeftag
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Indef:%>i # ;

LEXICON deftag
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Def: # ;



!! # Superlative
! ===========

LEXICON indef_superl_adj_decl
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Msc+Sg: indef_superl_msc_case    ;
 +Fem+Sg: indef_superl_femneu_case ;
 +Neu+Sg: indef_superl_femneu_case ;

! XXX consider these superlative def forms.
+Msc+Sg: adj_def_msc_case ;
+Fem+Sg: adj_def_fem_case ;
+Neu+Sg: adj_def_neu_case ;
+Msc+Pl: adj_def_pl ;
+Fem+Pl: adj_def_pl ;
+Neu+Pl: adj_def_pl ;



LEXICON indef_superl_msc_case
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Nom: indef_superl_msc ;
 +Acc: indef_superl_msc ;
 +Gen: indef_superl_msc ;
 +Dat: indef_superl_msc ;

LEXICON indef_superl_femneu_case
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Nom: indef_superl_femneu ;
 +Acc: indef_superl_femneu ;
 +Gen: indef_superl_femneu ;
 +Dat: indef_superl_femneu ;



LEXICON indef_superl_msc
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
 +Indef:%>ur # ;

LEXICON indef_superl_femneu
!!= **@LEXNAME@** 
       +Indef:    # ;

! fjerna 17.5.
! +Msc+Sg+Def:%>i # ; !XXX check.
! +Fem+Sg+Def:%>a # ;
! +Neu+Sg+Def:%>a # ;
