src/fst/morphology/stems/adjectives.lexc
LEXICON Adjectives
illur+A+CmpNP/None:ver Comp_Ri ; ! riggar
lágur+A+CmpNP/None:læg Comp_Ri ; ! riggar
næsthægstur+A+CmpNP/None:næst#hæg SRi ; ! riggar
næststørstur+A+CmpNP/None:næst#stør SRi ; ! riggar
seinur+A+CmpNP/None:seinn CI ; ! riggar
stórur+A+CmpNP/None:stør Comp_Ri ; ! riggar
syðri+A+CmpNP/None:syð Comp_Ri ; ! riggar
ytri+A+CmpNP/None:yt Comp_Ri ; ! riggar
fjórðstørstur+A+CmpNP/None:fjórð#stør SRi ; ! riggar ikki
fyrri+A+CmpNP/None:fyr Comp_Ri ; ! riggar ikki
triðstørstur+A+CmpNP/None:trið#stør SRi ; ! riggar ikki
